Maryland, session 2025, SB0680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
17–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Commission” means the State Real Estate Commission.
(k) “Licensee” means a licensed real estate broker, a licensed associate real estate
broker, or a licensed real estate salesperson.
17–315.
(a) (1) To qualify for renewal of a license under this subtitle, a licensee shall
complete at least 15 clock hours of continuing education instruction, as provided in
subsection (b) of this section, during the preceding 2–year term.
– 1 –

Ch. 398 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) For a licensee who provides real estate brokerage services solely in
connection with nonresidential real estate, of the clock hours required under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, [1.5] 2 clock hours [may] SHALL be satisfied by a course regarding [fair
housing laws and regulations or] the federal Americans with Disabilities Act.
(3) A licensee holding a license from another state must complete at least
the number of clock hours of continuing education instruction required under paragraph
(1) of this subsection during each 2–year license term and may substitute clock hours of
continuing education instruction earned in another state, if those clock hours:
(i) are approved as real estate continuing education in that state;
and
(ii) meet the distribution requirements of subsection (b)(2) of this
section.
(4) The Commission shall grant the substitution of clock hours in
paragraph (3) of this subsection only if the other state permits the substitution of clock
hours of continuing education instruction approved by the Commission for a licensee of this
State.
(b) (1) The Commission shall approve the form, substance, and, as provided
under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, subject matter of all continuing education
courses.
(2) For a licensee who has been issued a renewal certificate under § 17–314
of this subtitle, the subject matter approved by the Commission shall:
(i) relate to real estate or to a subject matter intended to assist a
licensee in providing real estate brokerage services to the public in a more efficient and
effective manner, provided that the subject matter is related to helping the public buy or
sell real estate;
(ii) every 2 years, include at least one 3 clock hour course that
outlines relevant changes that have occurred in federal, State, or local laws and
regulations, court cases and industry trends that have an impact on those laws and
regulations, or any combination of those laws, regulations, court cases, and industry trends;
(iii) every 2 years, include at least one [1.5] 2 clock hour course that
outlines federal, State, and local fair housing laws and regulations, including fair housing
advertising;
(iv) every 2 years, include at least one 3 clock hour ethics course that
includes a discussion of:
1. the Maryland Code of Ethics;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 398
2. [the practice of flipping;
3.] fraudulent real estate practices; and
[4.] 3. professionalism as it relates to the Maryland Code
of Ethics, including a discussion relating to conflict resolution and a licensee’s duty to
respect the public, peers, and property;
(v) every 2 years, include at least one 3 clock hour course that
includes the principles of real estate brokerage relationships and disclosures; and
(vi) every 2 years for the renewal of a real estate broker license and
the renewal of the license of an individual designated as a branch office manager or a team
leader, include at least one [3] 1.5 clock hour course that includes the requirements of
broker supervision.
(3) For a licensee who was issued an initial REAL ESTATE SALESPERSON
license under § 17–309 of this subtitle, the subject matter approved by the Commission
shall include:
(i) at least one 3 clock hour course for each of the following topics:
1. outlining contract writing, standard contract provisions,
key regional contract requirements, and standard addenda and contingencies;
2. the principles of real estate brokerage relationships and
disclosures [and disclosure requirements for sellers];
3. the principles of real estate practice in relation to:
A. advertising requirements for licensees;
B. the handling and [disclosure] DISBURSEMENT of escrow
funds; and
C. common ownership communities; and
4. property management and landlord and tenant laws; and
(ii) at least one 1.5 clock hour course for each of the following topics:
1. professionalism as it relates to the Maryland Code of
Ethics, including a discussion relating to conflict resolution and a licensee’s duty of respect
for the public, peers, and property; and
– 3 –

Ch. 398 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. real estate financing.
(4) The requirement of paragraph (2)(iii) of this subsection does not apply
to a licensee who provides real estate brokerage services solely in connection with
nonresidential real estate.
(5) To be acceptable for credit as a continuing education course under this
section, the course shall cover 1 or more topics approved by the Commission.
(c) (1) Continuing education courses may be conducted by:
(i) the Maryland Association of Realtors or its member boards;
(ii) the Real Estate Brokers of Baltimore, Inc.;
(iii) any similar professional association; or
(iv) an educational institution approved by the Commission.
(2) Continuing NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW,
CONTINUING education courses shall be taught by a qualified instructor who is
experienced in the real estate industry AND SELECTED BY THE COURSE PROVIDER.
(3) The Commission shall adopt regulations that provide for the conduct of
continuing education instruction courses by virtual or remote means.
(4) To verify the identity of an individual enrolled in a continuing education
course, the entity that conducts the continuing education course shall require, as a
condition of participating in the course, that the individual provide:
(i) for an in–person course, a photo identification; and
(ii) for a virtual or other remote course, a signed affidavit attesting
to the identity of the individual.
(d) If feasible, continuing education courses shall be offered at reasonable
intervals in each county and in each major geographic area of the larger counties.
(e) Within 14 days after completion of a continuing education course, the entity
that conducted the course may submit the course completion information directly to the
Commission and the licensee by electronic means.
(f) The Commission may waive the requirements of this section for a licensee if
the licensee shows good cause for being unable to meet the requirements.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 398
(g) The Commission shall require each course provider to pay a continuing
education course application fee [of $25] SET BY THE COMMISSION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 5 –